Florida, session 2026, SB1556.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 499.02955, Florida Statutes, is created 14 to read: 15 499.02955âExperimental Treatment Access Trust Fund.â 16 (1)âThere is created in the State Treasury the Experimental 17 Treatment Access Trust Fund within the Department of Health, 18 from which the Legislature may appropriate funds for the purpose 19 of assisting eligible patients who are residents of this state 20 with costs associated with travel to receive experimental 21 treatment or partial care costs under this section. 22 (2)âEach licensed experimental treatment center may 23 contribute 2 percent of net annual profits from experimental 24 treatments to the Experimental Treatment Access Trust Fund or 25 may provide at no cost experimental treatment care in an 26 equivalent amount as adopted by rule by the department. 27 (3)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 28 Constitution, the trust fund shall, unless terminated sooner, be 29 terminated on July 1, 2030. Before its termination, the trust 30 fund shall be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2). 31 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026, if SB 32 ___ or similar legislation is adopted in the same legislative 33 session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.